Washington statutes.
RCW 43.158.140

Clean energy coordinated permitting process—Cost-reimbursement agreements.

(1) For a fully coordinated permitting process, a project proponent must enter into a cost-reimbursement agreement with the department of ecology in accordance with RCW 43.21A.690. The cost-reimbursement agreement is to recover reasonable costs incurred by the department of ecology and participating agencies in carrying out the coordinated permitting process.

(2) The cost-reimbursement agreement may include deliverables and schedules for invoicing and reimbursement.

(3) For a fully coordinated permitting process, a project proponent must enter into a development agreement with the county, city, or town in which the project is proposed, in accordance with the authorization and requirements in RCW 36.70B.170 through 36.70B.210. The development agreement must detail the obligations of the local jurisdiction and the project applicant. It must also include, but not be limited to, the process the county, city, or town will implement for meeting its obligation to expedite the application, other clarifications for project phasing, and an estimate of reasonable costs.

(4) For a fully coordinated permitting process, a project proponent may enter directly into a cost-reimbursement agreement similar to that described in subsection (1) of this section, to reimburse the costs of a federally recognized Indian tribe for reviewing and providing input on the siting and permitting of a clean energy project.

(5) If a project proponent foresees, at any time, that it will be unable to meet its obligations under the agreement, it must notify the department of ecology and state the reasons, along with proposals for resolution.

[ 2023 c 230 s 208.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2023 c 230: See note following RCW 43.394.010.